Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 3. Management of the Common Interest Community

38-33.3-301.
Organization of unit owners’ association.

A unit owners’ association shall be organized no later than the date the first unit in the common interest community is conveyed to a purchaser. The membership of the association at all times shall consist exclusively of all unit owners or, following termination of the common interest community, of all former unit owners entitled to distributions of proceeds under section 38-33.3-218, or their heirs, personal representatives, successors, or assigns. The association shall be organized as a nonprofit, not-for-profit, or for-profit corporation or as a limited liability company in accordance with the laws of the state of Colorado; except that the failure of the association to incorporate or organize as a limited liability company will not adversely affect either the existence of the common interest community for purposes of this article or the rights of persons acting in reliance upon such existence, other than as specifically provided in section 38-33.3-316. Neither the choice of entity nor the organizational structure of the association shall be deemed to affect its substantive rights and obligations under this article.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1735, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 483, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1382, § 11, effective January 1, 2006.

38-33.3-302.
Powers of unit owners’ association.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and subject to the provisions of the declaration, the association, without specific authorization in the declaration, may:

Adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations;

Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners;

Hire and terminate managing agents and other employees, agents, and independent contractors;

Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two or more unit owners on matters affecting the common interest community;

Make contracts and incur liabilities;

Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements;

Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements;

Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real or personal property, subject to the following exceptions:

Common elements in a condominium or planned community may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest only pursuant to section 38-33.3-312; and

Part of a cooperative may be conveyed, or all or part of a cooperative may be subjected to a security interest, only pursuant to section 38-33.3-312;

Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements;

Impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements other than limited common elements described in section 38-33.3-202 (1)(b) and (1)(d);

Impose charges for late payment of assessments, recover reasonable attorney fees and other legal costs for collection of assessments and other actions to enforce the power of the association, regardless of whether or not suit was initiated, and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, levy reasonable fines for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association.

The association may not levy fines against a unit owner for violations of declarations, bylaws, or rules of the association for failure to adequately water landscapes or vegetation for which the unit owner is responsible when water restrictions or guidelines from the local water district or similar entity are in place and the unit owner is watering in compliance with such restrictions or guidelines. The association may require proof from the unit owner that the unit owner is watering the landscape or vegetation in a manner that is consistent with the maximum watering permitted by the restrictions or guidelines then in effect.

Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the declaration or statements of unpaid assessments;

Provide for the indemnification of its officers and executive board and maintain directors’ and officers’ liability insurance;

Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments, but only to the extent the declaration expressly so provides;

Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or bylaws;

Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this state by legal entities of the same type as the association; and

Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association.

The declaration may not impose limitations on the power of the association to deal with the declarant that are more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons.

Any managing agent, employee, independent contractor, or other person acting on behalf of the association shall be subject to this article to the same extent as the association itself would be.

Decisions concerning the approval or denial of a unit owner’s application for architectural or landscaping changes shall be made in accordance with standards and procedures set forth in the declaration or in duly adopted rules and regulations or bylaws of the association, and shall not be made arbitrarily or capriciously.

The association’s contract with a managing agent shall be terminable for cause without penalty to the association. Any such contract shall be subject to renegotiation.

Notwithstanding section 38-33.3-117 (1.5)(g), this subsection (4) shall not apply to an association that includes time-share units, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1735, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 2005:

IP(1) amended and (3) and (4) added, p. 1382, § 12, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2013:

(1)(k) amended,(SB 13-183), ch. 187, p. 758, § 4, effective May 10.

38-33.3-303.
Executive board members and officers - powers and duties - reserve funds - reserve study - audit.

Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, or subsection (3) of this section or any other provisions of this article, the executive board may act in all instances on behalf of the association.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, all members of the executive board shall have available to them all information related to the responsibilities and operation of the association obtained by any other member of the executive board. This information shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, reports of detailed monthly expenditures, contracts to which the association is a party, and copies of communications, reports, and opinions to and from any member of the executive board or any managing agent, attorney, or accountant employed or engaged by the executive board to whom the executive board delegates responsibilities under this article.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2.5) of this section:

If appointed by the declarant, in the performance of their duties, the officers and members of the executive board are required to exercise the care required of fiduciaries of the unit owners.

If not appointed by the declarant, no member of the executive board and no officer shall be liable for actions taken or omissions made in the performance of such member’s duties except for wanton and willful acts or omissions.

(2.5)

With regard to the investment of reserve funds of the association, the officers and members of the executive board shall be subject to the standards set forth in section 7-128-401, C.R.S.; except that, as used in that section:

“Corporation” or “nonprofit corporation” means the association.

“Director” means a member of the association’s executive board.

“Officer” means any person designated as an officer of the association and any person to whom the executive board delegates responsibilities under this article, including, without limitation, a managing agent, attorney, or accountant employed by the executive board.

The executive board may not act on behalf of the association to amend the declaration, to terminate the common interest community, or to elect members of the executive board or determine the qualifications, powers and duties, or terms of office of executive board members, but the executive board may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term.

Committees of the association shall be appointed pursuant to the governing documents of the association or, if the governing documents contain no applicable provisions, pursuant to section 7-128-206, C.R.S. The person appointed after August 15, 2009, to preside over any such committee shall meet the same qualifications as are required by the governing documents of the association for election or appointment to the executive board of the association.

Within ninety days after adoption of a proposed budget for the common interest community, the executive board shall mail, by first-class mail, or otherwise deliver, including posting the proposed budget on the association’s website, a summary of the budget to all the unit owners and shall set a date for a meeting of the unit owners to consider the budget. The meeting must occur within a reasonable time after mailing or other delivery of the summary, or as allowed for in the bylaws. The executive board shall give notice to the unit owners of the meeting as allowed for in the bylaws.

Unless the declaration requires otherwise, the budget proposed by the executive board does not require approval from the unit owners and it will be deemed approved by the unit owners in the absence of a veto at the noticed meeting by a majority of all unit owners, or if permitted in the declaration, a majority of a class of unit owners, or any larger percentage specified in the declaration, whether or not a quorum is present. If the proposed budget is vetoed, the periodic budget last proposed by the executive board and not vetoed by the unit owners must be continued until a subsequent budget proposed by the executive board is not vetoed by the unit owners.

This subsection (4)(a)(II) shall not apply to any common interest community formed prior to July 1, 1992, if the declaration sets a maximum assessment amount or limits the increase in an annual budget to a specific amount and the budget proposed by the executive board does not exceed the maximum amount or limits set in the declaration.

At the discretion of the executive board or upon request pursuant to subparagraph (II) or (III) of this paragraph (b) as applicable, the books and records of the association shall be subject to an audit, using generally accepted auditing standards, or a review, using statements on standards for accounting and review services, by an independent and qualified person selected by the board. Such person need not be a certified public accountant except in the case of an audit. A person selected to conduct a review shall have at least a basic understanding of the principles of accounting as a result of prior business experience, education above the high school level, or bona fide home study. The audit or review report shall cover the association’s financial statements, which shall be prepared using generally accepted accounting principles or the cash or tax basis of accounting.

An audit shall be required under this paragraph (b) only when both of the following conditions are met:

The association has annual revenues or expenditures of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars; and

An audit is requested by the owners of at least one-third of the units represented by the association.

A review shall be required under this paragraph (b) only when requested by the owners of at least one-third of the units represented by the association.

Copies of an audit or review under this paragraph (b) shall be made available upon request to any unit owner beginning no later than thirty days after its completion.

Notwithstanding section 38-33.3-117 (1.5)(h), this paragraph (b) shall not apply to an association that includes time-share units, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

Subject to subsection (6) of this section:

The declaration, except a declaration for a large planned community, may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by such declarant, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. Regardless of the period of declarant control provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of sixty days after conveyance of seventy-five percent of the units that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, two years after the last conveyance of a unit by the declarant in the ordinary course of business, or two years after any right to add new units was last exercised.

The declaration for a large planned community may provide for a period of declarant control of the association during which period a declarant, or persons designated by such declarant, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. Regardless of the period of declarant control provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates in a large planned community no later than the earlier of sixty days after conveyance of seventy-five percent of the maximum number of units that may be created under zoning or other governmental development approvals in effect for the large planned community at any given time to unit owners other than a declarant, six years after the last conveyance of a unit by the declarant in the ordinary course of business, or twenty years after recordation of the declaration.

A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before termination of the period of declarant control, but, in that event, the declarant may require, for the duration of the period of declarant control, that specified actions of the association or executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.

If a period of declarant control is to terminate in a large planned community pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), the declarant, or persons designated by the declarant, shall no longer have the right to appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board unless, prior to the termination date, the association approves an extension of the declarant’s ability to appoint and remove no more than a majority of the executive board by vote of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast in person or by proxy, other than by the declarant, at a meeting duly convened as required by law. Any such approval by the association may contain conditions and limitations. Such extension of declarant’s appointment and removal power, together with any conditions and limitations approved as provided in this paragraph (c), shall be included in an amendment to the declaration previously executed by the declarant.

Not later than sixty days after conveyance of twenty-five percent of the units that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, at least one member and not less than twenty-five percent of the members of the executive board must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant. Not later than sixty days after conveyance of fifty percent of the units that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, not less than thirty-three and one-third percent of the members of the executive board must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant.

Except as otherwise provided in section 38-33.3-220 (5), not later than the termination of any period of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect an executive board of at least three members, at least a majority of whom must be unit owners other than the declarant or designated representatives of unit owners other than the declarant. The executive board shall elect the officers. The executive board members and officers shall take office upon election.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, the unit owners, by a vote of sixty-seven percent of all persons present and entitled to vote at any meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any member of the executive board with or without cause, other than a member appointed by the declarant or a member elected pursuant to a class vote under section 38-33.3-207 (4).

Within sixty days after the unit owners other than the declarant elect a majority of the members of the executive board, the declarant shall deliver to the association all property of the unit owners and of the association held by or controlled by the declarant, including without limitation the following items:

The original or a certified copy of the recorded declaration as amended, the association’s articles of incorporation, if the association is incorporated, bylaws, minute books, other books and records, and any rules and regulations which may have been promulgated;

An accounting for association funds and financial statements, from the date the association received funds and ending on the date the period of declarant control ends. The financial statements shall be audited by an independent certified public accountant and shall be accompanied by the accountant’s letter, expressing either the opinion that the financial statements present fairly the financial position of the association in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles or a disclaimer of the accountant’s ability to attest to the fairness of the presentation of the financial information in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and the reasons therefor. The expense of the audit shall not be paid for or charged to the association.

The association funds or control thereof;

All of the declarant’s tangible personal property that has been represented by the declarant to be the property of the association or all of the declarant’s tangible personal property that is necessary for, and has been used exclusively in, the operation and enjoyment of the common elements, and inventories of these properties;

A copy, for the nonexclusive use by the association, of any plans and specifications used in the construction of the improvements in the common interest community;

All insurance policies then in force, in which the unit owners, the association, or its directors and officers are named as insured persons;

Copies of any certificates of occupancy that may have been issued with respect to any improvements comprising the common interest community;

Any other permits issued by governmental bodies applicable to the common interest community and which are currently in force or which were issued within one year prior to the date on which unit owners other than the declarant took control of the association;

Written warranties of the contractor, subcontractors, suppliers, and manufacturers that are still effective;

A roster of unit owners and mortgagees and their addresses and telephone numbers, if known, as shown on the declarant’s records;

Employment contracts in which the association is a contracting party;

Any service contract in which the association is a contracting party or in which the association or the unit owners have any obligation to pay a fee to the persons performing the services; and

For large planned communities, copies of all recorded deeds and all recorded and unrecorded leases evidencing ownership or leasehold rights of the large planned community unit owners’ association in all common elements within the large planned community.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1737, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(7), (8), and (9)(e) amended, p. 651, § 16, effective April 30.

L. 94:

(5) and (8) amended, p. 2848, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(5)(a), (9)(k), and (9)(l) amended and (5)(c) and (9)(m) added, pp. 238, 239, §§ 5, 6, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(4) and (5)(a)(I) amended, p. 768, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 1383, § 13, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(2) and (4)(b) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1221, § 9, effective May 26.

L. 2009:

(1) and (3) amended,(HB 09-1359), ch. 257, p. 1164, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(4)(a) amended,(HB 16-1149), ch. 104, p. 300, § 3, effective July 1, 2018.

L. 2018:

(4)(a)(II) amended,(HB 18-1342), ch. 387, p. 2317, § 2, effective July 1.

38-33.3-303.5.
Construction defect actions - disclosure - approval by unit owners - definitions - exemptions.

Before the executive board, pursuant to section 38-33.3-302 (1)(d), institutes a construction defect action, the executive board shall comply with this section.

For the purposes of this section only:

“Construction defect action”:

Means any civil action or arbitration proceeding for damages, indemnity, subrogation, or contribution brought against a construction professional to assert a claim, counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim for damages or loss to, or the loss of use of, real or personal property or personal injury caused by a defect in the design or construction of an improvement to real property, regardless of the theory of liability; and

Includes any related, ancillary, or derivative claim, and any claim for breach of fiduciary duty or an act or omission of a member of an association’s executive board, that arises from an alleged construction defect or that seeks the same or similar damages.

“Construction professional” has the meaning set forth in section 13-20-802.5 (4).

Meeting to consider commencement of construction defect action - disclosures - required terms. (I) The executive board shall mail or deliver written notice of the anticipated commencement of the construction defect action to each unit owner at the owner’s last-known address described in the association’s records and to the last-known address of each construction professional against whom a construction defect action is proposed; except that this notice requirement does not apply to:

Construction professionals identified after the notice is mailed; or

Joined parties in a construction defect action previously approved by owners pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section.

(II)

The notice given pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) must call a meeting of the unit owners, which must be held no less than ten days and no more than fifteen days after the mailing date of the notice, to consider whether to bring a construction defect action. A failure to hold the meeting within this time period voids the subsequent vote. A quorum is not required at the meeting. In no event shall the time period for providing the notice required pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section, holding the meeting required pursuant to this subsection (1)(c)(II), and voting as required by subsection (1)(d) of this section exceed ninety days. The notice must state that:

(A)

The conclusion of the meeting initiates the voting period, during which the association will accept votes for and against proceeding with the construction defect action. The disclosure and voting period shall end ninety days after the mailing date of the meeting notice or when the association determines that the construction defect action is either approved or disapproved, whichever occurs first.

(B)

The construction professional against whom the construction defect action is proposed will be invited to attend and will have an opportunity to address the unit owners concerning the alleged construction defect; and

The presentation at the meeting by the construction professional or the construction professional’s designee or designees may, but is not required to, include an offer to remedy any defect in accordance with section 13-20-803.5 (3) of the “Construction Defect Action Reform Act”.

(III)

The notice given pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) must also contain a description of the nature of the construction defect action, which description identifies alleged defects with reasonable specificity, the relief sought, a good-faith estimate of the benefits and risks involved, and any other pertinent information. The notice shall also include the following disclosures:
1. The alleged construction defects might result in increased costs to the association in maintenance or repair or cause an increase in assessments or special assessments to cover the cost of repairs.
2. If the association does not file a claim before the applicable legal deadlines, the claim will expire.
3. Until the alleged defects are repaired, sellers of units within the common interest community might owe unit buyers a duty to disclose known defects.
4. The executive board (intends to enter) (has entered) into a fee arrangement with the attorneys representing the association, under which (the attorneys will be paid a contingency fee equal to ______ percent of the (net) (gross) recovery of the amount the association recovers from the defendant(s)) (the association’s attorneys will be paid (an hourly fee of $_____) (a fixed fee of $_____)).
5. In addition to attorney fees, the association may incur up to $_______ for legal costs, including expert witnesses, depositions, and filing fees. The amount will not be exceeded without the executive board’s further written authority. If the association does not prevail on its claim, the association may be responsible for paying these legal expenses.
6. If the association does not prevail on its claim, the association may be responsible for paying its attorney fees.
7. If the association does not prevail on its claim, a court or arbitrator sometimes awards costs and attorney fees to the opposing party. Should that happen in this case, the association may be responsible for paying the opposing party’s costs and fees as a result of such award.
8. There is no guarantee that the association will recover enough funds to repair the claimed construction defect(s). If the claimed defects are not repaired, additional damage to property and a reduction in the useful life of the common elements might occur.
9. Until the claimed construction defects are repaired, or until the construction defect claim is concluded, the market value of the units in the association might be adversely affected.
10. Until the claimed construction defect(s) are repaired, or until the construction defect(s) claim is concluded, owners in the association might have difficulty refinancing and prospective buyers might have difficulty obtaining financing. In addition, certain federal underwriting standards or regulations prevent refinancing or obtaining a new loan in projects where a construction defect is claimed, and certain lenders as a matter of policy will not refinance or provide a new loan in projects where a construction defect is claimed.

(IV)

The association shall maintain a verified owner mailing list that identifies the owners to whom the association mailed the notice required pursuant to this subsection (1)(c). The verified owner mailing list shall include, for each owner, the address, if any, to which the association mailed the notice required pursuant to this subsection (1)(c). The association shall provide a copy of the verified owner mailing list to each construction professional who is sent a notice pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) at the owner meeting required under subsection (1)(c)(II) of this section. The owner mailing list shall be deemed verified if a specimen copy of the mailing list is certified by an association officer or agent. If the association commences a construction defect action against any construction professional, the association shall file its verified owner mailing list and records of votes received from owners during the voting period with the appropriate forum under seal.

(V)

The substance of a proposed construction defect action may be amended or supplemented after the meeting, but an amended or supplemented claim does not extend the voting period. The executive board shall give notice to unit owners of any amended or supplemented claim and shall maintain records of its communications with unit owners. Owner approval pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section is not required for amendments or supplements to a construction defect action made after the notice pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) is sent.

Approval by unit owners - procedures.Vote count - exclusions. (I) (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law or any requirement in the governing documents, the executive board may initiate the construction defect action only if authorized within the voting period by owners of units to which a majority of votes in the association are allocated. Such approval is not required for an association to proceed with a construction defect action if the alleged construction defect pertains to a facility that is intended and used for nonresidential purposes and if the cost to repair the alleged defect does not exceed fifty thousand dollars. Such approval is not required for an association to proceed with a construction defect action when the association is the contracting party for the performance of labor or purchase of services or materials.

(I) (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an owner’s vote shall be submitted only once and may be obtained in any written format confirming the owner’s vote to approve or reject the proposed construction defect action. The association shall maintain a record of all votes until the conclusion of the construction defect action, including all appeals, if any.

Nothing in this section alters the tolling provisions of section 13-20-805.

All statutes of limitation and repose applicable to claims based on defects described with reasonable specificity in the notice, which may be supplemented or amended pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(IV) of this section, are tolled from the date the notice sent pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section is mailed until either the ninety-day voting and disclosure period ends or until the association determines that the construction defect action is either approved or disapproved, whichever occurs first.

The applicable statutes of limitation and repose that apply to claims based on a defect described in the notice with reasonable specificity are tolled pursuant to this subsection (1)(d)(II) once, and may not extend the statutes of limitation and repose that apply to claims based on that defect for more than a total of ninety days, respectively. If a defect not included in the notice sent pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section is the subject of a later vote, tolling pursuant to this subsection (1)(d) applies unless the claim based on that defect is otherwise barred by the statute of limitations or statute of repose.

Vote count - exclusions. For purposes of calculating the required majority vote under this subsection (1)(d) only, the following votes are excluded:

Any votes allocated to units owned by a development party. As used in this subsection (1)(d)(III)(A), “development party” means a contractor, subcontractor, developer, or builder responsible for any part of the design, construction, or repair of any portion of the common interest community and any of that party’s affiliates; and “affiliate” includes an entity controlled or owned, in whole or in part, by any person that controls or owns a development party or by the spouse of a development party.

Any votes allocated to units owned by banking institutions, unless a vote from such an institution is actually received by the association;

Any votes allocated to units of a product type in which no defects are alleged, in a common interest community whose declaration provides that common expense liabilities are not shared between the product types;

Any votes allocated to units owned by owners who are deemed nonresponsive. If the status of the nonresponsive unit owners is challenged in court, the court shall consider whether the executive board has made diligent efforts to contact the unit owner regarding the vote and may consider: Whether a mailing was returned as undeliverable; whether the owner appears to be residing at the unit; and whether the association has used other contact information, such as an electronic mail address or telephone number for the owner.

Notice to construction professional. At least five business days before the mailing of the notice required by subsection (1)(c) of this section, the association shall notify each construction professional against whom a construction defect action is proposed by mail, at its last-known address, of the date and time of the meeting called to consider the construction defect action pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section.

Repealed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Require the disclosure in the notice or the disclosure to a unit owner of attorney-client communications or other privileged communications;

Permit the notice to serve as a basis for any person to assert the waiver of any applicable privilege or right of confidentiality resulting from, or to claim immunity in connection with, the disclosure of information in the notice; or

Limit or impair the authority of the executive board to contract for legal services, or limit or impair the ability to enforce such a contract for legal services.

Provisions not severable. Notwithstanding section 2-4-204, the general assembly finds, determines, and declares that if any provision of this section or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the entire section shall be deemed invalid.

History.

Source:
L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 390, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (2) repealed, and (4) added,(HB 17-1279), ch. 232, p. 901, § 1, effective May 23.